Wyoming, session 2025, SF0003.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 23-1-101(a)(i), 23-1-302(a) by
creating a new paragraph (xxxiv) and (h), 23-1-703(g),
23-1-705(c), (e)(i) through (iii), (g) and (j),
23-2-101(f)(intro), (ii), by creating a new paragraph
(iii), by renumbering (iii) as (iv), (j)(xiv) through
(xvii), by creating new paragraphs (xlvii) through (l) and
(m), 23-3-102(d), 23-3-105(a) and (b), 23-3-301(a) and (b)
and 35-7-1302(a) are amended to read:
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059

23-1-101. Definitions of wildlife.

(a) As used in this act:

(i) "Big game animal" means antelope, bighorn
sheep, mule deer, whitetail deer, elk, moose or mountain
goat;

23-1-302. Powers and duties.

(a) The commission is directed and empowered:

(xxxiv) To promulgate rules governing the
issuance of separate hunting licenses and establish
separate hunting seasons for the taking of mule deer and
whitetail deer.

(h) For purposes of promoting the maintenance of
wildlife habitat and attaining wildlife management
objectives pursuant to W.S. 23-1-103 and in addition to
duties prescribed under paragraph (a)(xiv) of this section,
the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
governing the issuance of elk, mule deer, whitetail deer,
antelope and turkey hunting licenses to Wyoming landowners
without subjection to prescribed means of competitive
public issuance. Fees assessed for licenses authorized
under this subsection shall be equal to fees prescribed
under W.S. 23-2-101(j) for each species for which the
license is issued.

23-1-703. Limitation of number of certain licenses;
reservation of certain licenses; reservation of certain
unused licenses.

(g) In addition to the authority granted under
subsection (b) of this section, the commission may through
rule and regulation develop and implement a preference
point program for nonresident antelope, nonresident mule
deer, nonresident whitetail deer and nonresident elk
licenses which are limited in quota and would otherwise be
issued through a random drawing. A program established
pursuant to this subsection may be implemented for all or
selected hunt areas and may be applied to all or portions
of licenses for any particular species. The commission may
charge nonresident license applicants a nonrefundable fee
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
to accumulate preference points under the program as
provided in W.S. 23-2-101(m).

23-1-705. Complimentary licenses; pioneer licenses;
antelope hunt licenses; gunpowder and buckskin hunt
licenses; gratuitous licenses; donated licenses.

(c) In addition the commission may, upon payment of
mule deer and whitetail deer license fees, issue up to a
total of twenty-five (25) licenses each year for the
exclusive use of gunpowder and buckskin hunts.

(e) The department shall issue:

(i) For a fee of two dollars ($2.00) a resident
mule deer, whitetail deer, antelope or wild turkey license
and for a fee of five dollars ($5.00) an elk license to any
resident who is at least seventy-five (75) years of age
prior to the issuance of the license and who has
continuously resided in Wyoming for at least the fifty (50)
years immediately preceding application for the license;

SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
(ii) For a fee established by rule of the
commission a resident mule deer, whitetail deer, antelope,
wild turkey or elk license to any resident who is at least
seventy (70) years of age prior to the issuance of the
license and has continuously resided in Wyoming for at
least fifty (50) years immediately preceding application
for the license. The fee established for a license under
this paragraph shall be not more than sixty-five percent
(65%) nor less than sixty percent (60%) of the resident fee
specified in W.S. 23-2-101 for the particular species;

(iii) Without charge a resident elk, or deer
mule deer or whitetail deer license in any hunt area not
subject to prescribed means of competitive public issuance,
a resident game bird and a resident small game license to
any resident who is on active duty in the United States
armed forces deployed to a combat zone who is home on leave
during the applicable hunting season. Application under
this section shall include proof of residency required
under W.S. 23-2-101(a), certification of the applicant's
active duty deployment to a combat zone and other
information required by rule and regulation of the
commission. For purposes of this paragraph, a combat zone
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
is any area which the president of the United States
designates by executive order as an area in which the armed
forces of the United States are engaged in combat;

(g) In addition to complimentary licenses under
subsection (a) of this section, each appointed commissioner
may cause to be issued at cost not more than a total of
eight (8) elk, mule deer, whitetail deer or antelope
designated licenses per year. All licenses issued under
this subsection shall be designated to nonprofit charitable
organizations. As a condition of accepting the license, the
organization shall agree to auction or otherwise bid the
license to the highest bidder or to raffle the license to
members of the public.

(j) In addition the commission may issue upon payment
of proper fees any number, set by rule and regulation, of
antelope licenses, mule deer licenses, whitetail deer
licenses, elk licenses and turkey licenses each year for
the exclusive use by persons twenty (20) years of age or
younger with life threatening illnesses who are sponsored
by a nonprofit charitable organization with a mission to
provide opportunities and experiences to persons with life
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
threatening or serious illnesses. As a condition of issuing
the license, the sponsoring organization shall pay the
appropriate license fee on behalf of the licensee and at no
cost to the licensee.

23-2-101. Fees; restrictions; nonresident application
fee; nonresident licenses; verification of residency
required.

(f) Forty percent (40%) of available nonresident elk
licenses, forty percent (40%) of available nonresident mule
deer licenses, forty percent (40%) of available nonresident
whitetail deer licenses and forty percent (40%) of
available nonresident antelope licenses for any one (1)
calendar year shall as established by the commission, be
offered to nonresident applicants upon receipt of the fee
prescribed by this subsection. Seventy-five (75) of the
nonresident mule deer and whitetail deer licenses set aside
pursuant to under this subsection shall be used for a
national bow hunt for mule deer and whitetail deer. The
licenses authorized by this subsection shall be offered by
drawing to nonresident applicants prior to the drawing for
the remaining nonresident licenses issued. The licenses
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
offered under this subsection shall be issued in a manner
prescribed by rules and regulations promulgated by the
commission. Nothing in this subsection shall prohibit any
unsuccessful applicant for a nonresident license pursuant
to this subsection from submitting an application for any
licenses remaining after the drawing during the calendar
year in which the application under this subsection was
submitted. The following fees shall be collected by the
department and are in addition to the nonresident license
fee for the appropriate big game species imposed under
subsection (j) of this section and the application fee
imposed under subsection (e) of this section:

(ii) Nonresident mule deer license .... $826.00
in addition to the license fee imposed under paragraph
(j)(xv) of this section;

(iii) Nonresident whitetail deer license.......
$826.00 in addition to the license fee imposed under
paragraph (j)(lvii) of this section;

SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
(iii)(iv) Nonresident antelope license.....
$874.00 in addition to the license fee imposed under
paragraph (j)(xxxi) of this section.

(j) Subject to W.S. 23-2-101(f), 23-1-705(e) and the
applicable fee under W.S. 23-1-701, the following hunting
licenses and tags may be purchased for the fee indicated
and subject to the limitations provided:

(xiv) Resident mule deer license; one (1) mule
deer................................................$40.00

(xv) Nonresident mule deer license; one (1) mule
deer..............................................$372.00

(xvi) Resident youth mule deer license; one (1)
mule deer..........................................$15.00

(xvii) Nonresident youth mule deer license; one
(1) mule deer.....................................$110.00

(xlvii) Resident whitetail deer license; one (1)
whitetail deer.....................................$40.00
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059

(xlviii) Nonresident whitetail deer license; one
(1) whitetail deer................................$372.00

(xlix) Resident youth whitetail deer license;
one (1) whitetail deer.............................$15.00

(l) Nonresident youth whitetail deer license;
one (1) whitetail deer............................$110.00

(m) Subject to the provisions of this subsection, as
part of any preference point program for nonresident
antelope, nonresident ram bighorn sheep, nonresident moose,
nonresident mule deer, nonresident whitetail deer or
nonresident elk, the commission may establish a
nonrefundable fee to be either withheld from the license
fee remitted or submitted separately when application for a
license or preference point is made through electronic
licensing, and may also establish a fee to be paid in lieu
of applying for licenses that are limited in quota.
Retention of the established fee or payment of the fee in
lieu of applying shall authorize the person to accumulate a
preference point for future drawings for licenses that are
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
limited in quota for the applicable species in accordance
with rules of the commission. The rules may provide for the
loss of all accumulated points for persons failing to apply
or to pay the in lieu fee in two (2) consecutive calendar
years. The fee for any program under this subsection for
antelope, mule deer, whitetail deer or elk shall be
established by rule and shall not exceed seventy-five
dollars ($75.00) per species. Payment of the fee shall be
made in compliance with application dates. Nothing in this
subsection authorizes the commission to establish or retain
a fee for resident moose or resident ram bighorn sheep
license preference points in addition to the fee
established by subsection (k) of this section or to
establish rules for ram bighorn sheep or moose preference
point drawings in conflict with the provisions of W.S.
23-1-703(b). For nonresident ram bighorn sheep and
nonresident moose licenses, the commission may establish by
rule a nonrefundable preference point fee to be withheld
from either the license fee remitted or submitted
separately when application for a license or preference
point is made through electronic licensing and may
establish a fee in lieu of making application in an amount
greater than that established under subsection (k) of this
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
section, but neither fee shall exceed one hundred fifty
dollars ($150.00). Fees established under this subsection
may be set at lower amounts for youth license applicants.

23-3-102. Taking certain game animals without license
or during a closed season prohibited.

(d) Any person who knowingly takes any antlered elk,
antlered mule deer, antlered whitetail deer, antlered
moose, horned antelope, bighorn sheep, mountain goat,
mountain lion, grizzly bear or black bear without the
proper license or during a closed season and any person who
knowingly kills a mountain lion during a mountain lion
pursuit season, except as otherwise permitted by this act,
is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less
than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) nor more than ten
thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for not more
than one (1) year, or both. A third or subsequent
conviction within ten (10) years for a violation of this
subsection shall constitute a felony punishable by a fine
of not less than five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) nor more
than ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00), imprisonment for
not more than two (2) years, or both. For the purposes of
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
determining whether a violation of this subsection is a
felony, convictions resulting from the same occurrence
shall be considered a single conviction even if the result
of the occurrence is more than one (1) misdemeanor
conviction. The provisions of W.S. 6-8-101(a) shall not
apply to convictions under this section.

23-3-105. Antelope, mule deer, whitetail deer and elk
coupons; payment to landowner; kill on federal or state
land.

(a) Antelope, mule deer, whitetail deer and elk
licenses shall have two (2) coupons attached, each bearing
the same serial number as the body of the permit, one (1)
designated "antelope, mule deer, whitetail deer or elk
coupon" and one (1) designated "landowner's coupon".

(b) The landowner's coupon shall promptly be
detached, dated, signed and delivered to the landowner.
The landowner, on or before March 1 following the close of
the hunting season for which the license was issued, shall
deliver to the department the coupon and an affidavit that
the antelope, mule deer, whitetail deer or elk for which
SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
the coupon was delivered was killed on his land. Upon
receipt of the coupon and affidavit the department shall
pay the landowner sixteen dollars ($16.00) for each coupon
from an antelope, mule deer, whitetail deer or elk license.
Landowner's coupons are not transferable. Any unauthorized
person attempting to collect any sum for any landowner's
coupon is guilty of a high misdemeanor punishable as
provided in W.S. 23-6-202(a)(ii). Effective January 1,
2000, the department shall provide a checkoff box on each
landowner coupon affidavit claim form that offers the
claimant the opportunity to designate the animal damage
management board to receive his payment amount for
landowner coupons claimed on that form. For each claim made
where the landowner has designated his payment to the
animal damage management board, the department shall
transfer that amount to the animal damage management
account created by W.S. 11-6-306 and the department shall
retain the fees related to those administrative costs of
the transfer.

23-3-301. Importation and sale of wildlife
prohibited; exceptions.

SF0003

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0059
(a) No person shall import into Wyoming from any
source any living antelope, bear, mule deer, whitetail
deer, elk, moose, mountain goat, mountain lion, bighorn
sheep, wolf, wolf hybrid nor any living wildlife except as
otherwise permitted by this act.

(b) No person shall sell any living antelope, bear,
mule deer, whitetail deer, elk, moose, mountain goat,
mountain lion, bighorn sheep, wolf, wolf hybrid or falcon
except as permitted by the commission.

35-7-1302. Donation of game animals.

(a) Any game animal, including any big game animal,
elk, mule deer, whitetail deer, mountain sheep, wild goat,
antelope, moose or bear, lawfully taken by a licensed
hunter may be donated to a nonprofit organization under the
provisions of W.S. 35-7-1301 to feed individuals in need.

Section 2. This act is effective January 1, 2026.

(END)
SF0003